District of Columbia statutes.
8-671.12

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-95, § 112, 53 DCR 1652
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 12 of the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act.